Louisiana, session 2026, HB1242.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:407.39(I) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§407.39. Licenses; application; temporary or provisional; fees
* * *
I. The department may issue a Type III license to more than one early
learning center that applies for licensure at the same location as a public or nonpublic
school.